Utah statutes.
48-1-47.   Regulatory agency or board authority -- Prohibitions on
individuals apply.
(1)  Sections 48-1-41 through 48-1-48 do not restrict or limit the authority
and duty of any appropriate regulatory agency or board to license individual
persons rendering professional services or the practice of the profession that
is within the jurisdiction of the regulatory agency or board, notwithstanding
that the person is a partner or employee of a limited liability partnership
and rendering the professional services or engaging in the practice of the
profession through the limited liability partnership.
(2)  No limited liability partnership may do anything that is prohibited to be
done by an individual licensed to practice the profession that the limited
liability partnership is organized to render.
